Washington statutes.
RCW 19.210.030

Chapter not applicable—Trade show, certain persons.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1) Business conducted in any industry or association trade show; or

(2) Anyone who sells by sample, catalog, or brochure for future delivery.

[ 2001 c 160 s 3.]